Utah statutes.
35A-3-101.   Title -- Employment assistance.

(1)  This chapter shall be known as the "Employment Support Act."

(2)  A person eligible for employment assistance under Chapter 3 or 5 shall receive any assistance under the applicable chapter, including stabilization, assessment, training, or placement, through the department in accordance with Chapter 2, Part 2, Service Delivery.



Amended by Chapter 1, 1998 General Session

